Massachusetts, session 194th, S1092.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 103 of chapter 266 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after the word “tar” in line 4, the following:- ", urine".
of 1